Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,115
Hospital authority; bonds; who may purchase.

Bonds issued by any authority under the provisions of sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 are hereby made securities in which all agencies, public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, state banks and trust companies, national banking associations, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized by law, and shall also be eligible and lawful security for all deposits of public funds of the state and of its political subdivisions, to the extent of the full value of the bonds and appurtenant coupons.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 42;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.115.